Idaho, session 2026, H0800.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 39-4105, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-4105. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter, the terms defined in
this section shall have the following meanings, unless the context clearly
indicates another meaning. Where terms are not defined in this chap-
ter and are defined in the currently adopted International Building Code
international building code published by the International Code Council
international code council, such terms shall have the meanings ascribed to
them in that code:
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the division of occupa-
tional and professional licenses for the state of Idaho.
(2) "Board" means the Idaho building code board, herein created.
(3) "Building inspector" means a person who inspects buildings or
structures for compliance with the provisions of this chapter.
(4) "Construction" means the erection, fabrication, reconstruction,
demolition, alteration, conversion, or repair of a building or the installa-
tion of equipment therein normally a part of the structure.
(5) "Division" means the state of Idaho division of occupational and
professional licenses.
(6) "International Fire Code fire code" means the International Fire
Code international fire code as published by the International Code Council
international code council.
(7) "Local government" means any city or county of this state.
(8) "Manufactured home" means a structure, constructed after June 15,
1976, in accordance with the HUD manufactured home construction and safety
standards, and is transportable in one (1) or more sections, which that, in
the traveling mode, is eight (8) body feet or more in width or is forty (40)
body feet or more in length, or when erected on site, is three hundred twenty
(320) or more square feet, and which that is built on a permanent chassis
and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent founda-
tion when connected to the required utilities, and includes the plumbing,
heating, air conditioning, and electrical systems contained therein, ex-
cept that such term shall include any structure which that meets all the re-
quirements of this subsection except the size requirements and with respect
to which the manufacturer voluntarily files a certification required by the


secretary of housing and urban development and complies with the standards
established under 42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq. Manufactured homes include multid-
welling unit manufactured homes that are constructed in accordance with the
HUD manufactured home construction and safety standards.
(9) "Mobile home" means a factory-assembled structure or structures
generally constructed prior to June 15, 1976, and equipped with the neces-
sary service connections and made so as to be readily movable as a unit or
units on their own running gear and designed to be used as a dwelling unit or
units with or without a permanent foundation.
(10) "Telecommunications facilities" means all wires, cables, equip-
ment, apparatus or other installations necessary to furnish service, by
which there is accomplished or may be accomplished the sending or receiving
of information, data, message writing signs, signals, pictures, and sounds
of all kinds, by aid of such wires, cables, equipment, apparatus or other
installations, but shall not include the habitable structure in which such
telecommunications facilities are housed.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-6509A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6509A. SITING OF MANUFACTURED HOMES IN RESIDENTIAL AREAS -- PLAN
TO BE AMENDED. (1) By resolution or ordinance adopted, amended, or repealed
in accordance with the notice and hearing procedures provided under section
67-6509, Idaho Code, each governing board shall amend its comprehensive plan
and land use regulations for all land zoned for single-family residential
uses, except for lands falling within an area defined as a historic district
under section 67-4607, Idaho Code, to allow for siting of manufactured homes
as defined in section 39-4105, Idaho Code. For purposes of siting, a manu-
factured home consisting of a single dwelling unit may be sited on lots where
single-family dwellings are allowed. A multidwelling unit manufactured
home may be sited only in areas where multifamily dwellings are allowed.
(2) Manufactured homes on individual lots zoned for single-family res-
idential uses as provided in subsection (1) of this section shall be in ad-
dition to manufactured homes on lots within designated mobile home parks or
manufactured home subdivisions.
(3) This section shall not be construed as abrogating a recorded re-
strictive covenant.
(4) A governing board may adopt any or all of the following placement
standards, or any less restrictive standards, for the approval of manufac-
tured homes located outside mobile home parks:
(a) The manufactured home shall be may be either a single section or
multisectional and shall enclose a space of not less than one thousand
(1,000) square feet at least four hundred (400) square feet for a single
section or eight hundred (800) square feet for a multisectional manu-
factured home;
(b) The manufactured home shall be placed on an excavated and back-
filled foundation and enclosed at the perimeter such that the home is
located not more than twelve (12) inches above grade, except when placed
on a basement foundation;


(c) The manufactured home shall have a pitched roof, except that no
standards shall require a slope of greater than a nominal three (3) feet
in height for each twelve (12) feet in width;
(d) The manufactured home shall have exterior siding and roofing which
in color, material, and appearance is similar to the exterior siding and
roofing material commonly used on residential dwellings within the com-
munity or which is comparable to the predominant materials used on sur-
rounding dwellings as determined by the local permit approval author-
ity;
(e) The manufactured home shall have a garage or carport constructed of
like materials if zoning ordinances would require a newly constructed
nonmanufactured home to have a garage or carport;
(f) In addition to the provisions of paragraphs (a) through (e) of this
subsection, a city or county may subject a manufactured home and the lot
upon on which it is sited to any development standard, architectural re-
quirement, and minimum size requirements to which a conventional sin-
gle-family residential dwelling on the same lot would be subjected.
(5) Any approval standards, special conditions and the procedures for
approval adopted by a local government shall be clear and objective and shall
not have the effect, either in themselves or cumulatively, of discouraging
needed housing through unreasonable cost or delay.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.